Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7409
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Unfair Discrimination Against Subjects of Abuse in Insurance Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1035, § 22.